District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-6017

Termination of operations and accounts; expiration of chapter

Repealed.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-51, § 17, 40 DCR 6120

History

1981 Ed., §§ 35-1901 to 35-1917.

Prior Codifications